District of Columbia statutes.
4-756.02

Rulemaking authority.

(a)

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, may issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter. The proposed rules shall be submitted to the Council for a 45-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed rules, in whole or in part, by resolution within this 45-day review period, the proposed rules shall be deemed approved.

(b)

Within 90 days of May 3, 2014, the Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], and subject to the Council review period of subsection (a) of this section, shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter, including:

(1)

The data collection requirements of § 4-753.02(c);

(2)

The training requirements of § 4-754.21a; and

(3)

The grant-making requirements of § 4-755.01.

Oct. 22, 2005, D.C. Law 16-35, § 31, 52 DCR 8113
May 3, 2014, D.C. Law 20-100, § 2(l), 61 DCR 1873
This section is referenced in § 4-753.01, § 4-754.33, and § 4-754.56.
The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-100 designated the existing text as (a); and added (b).
Delegation of Authority Pursuant to D.C. Law 16-35, the Homeless Services Reform Act of 2005, see Mayor’s Order 2006-20, February 13, 2006 ( 53 DCR 2721).